Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.800

Report to legislature—2021 c 206 ss 2 and 3; 2019 c 322 ss 2-6; 2018 c 162.

(1) The Washington state institute for public policy must:

(a) Assess the impact of chapter 162, Laws of 2018, sections 2 through 6, chapter 322, Laws of 2019, and sections 2 and 3, chapter 206, Laws of 2021 on community safety, racial disproportionality, recidivism, state expenditures, and youth rehabilitation, to the extent possible; and

(b) Conduct a cost-benefit analysis, including health impacts and recidivism effects, of extending RCW 72.01.410 to include all offenses committed under the age of twenty-one.

(2) The institute shall submit, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a preliminary report on the requirements listed in subsection (1) of this section to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2031.

[ 2021 c 206 s 9; 2019 c 322 s 5; 2018 c 162 s 9.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Findings—Appropriation—Rental vouchers—2021 c 206: See notes following RCW 72.01.412.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 322: See note following RCW 72.01.410.